Utah statutes.
53A-1a-501.5.   State Charter School Board created.

(1)  As used in this section, "organization that represents Utah's charter schools" means an organization, except a governmental entity, that advocates for charter schools, charter school parents, or charter school students.

(2) (a)  The State Charter School Board is created consisting of the following members appointed by the governor:

(i)  two members who have expertise in finance or small business management;

(ii)  three members who:

(A)  are nominated by an organization that represents Utah's charter schools; and

(B)  have expertise or experience in developing or administering a charter school; and

(iii)  two members who are nominated by the State Board of Education.

(b)  Each appointee shall have demonstrated dedication to the purposes of charter schools as outlined in Section 53A-1a-503.

(c)  At least two candidates shall be nominated for each appointment made under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) or (iii).

(d)  The governor may seek nominations for a prospective appointment under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) from one or more organizations that represent Utah's charter schools.

(3) (a)  State Charter School Board members shall serve four-year terms.

(b)  If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a replacement for the unexpired term.

(4)  The governor may remove a member at any time for official misconduct, habitual or willful neglect of duty, or for other good and sufficient cause.

(5) (a)  The State Charter School Board shall annually elect a chair from its membership.

(b)  Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

(c)  Meetings may be called by the chair or upon request of three members of the board.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 429, 2011 General Session

